Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-104. Concurrent jurisdiction.

The juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction with the probate court of proceedings to:

Treat or commit a developmentally disabled or mentally ill child;

Determine the custody or appoint a guardian of the person of a child; and

Give judicial consent to the marriage of a child if consent is required by law.

The juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction with the general sessions court for the offenses of contributing to the delinquency or unruly conduct of a minor as defined in § 37-1-156 and contributing to the dependency of a minor as defined in § 37-1-157.

The juvenile, circuit and chancery courts have concurrent jurisdiction to terminate parental or guardian rights pursuant to the provisions of title 36, chapter 1, part 1.

The juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction and statewide jurisdiction with other courts having the jurisdiction to order support for minor children and shall have statewide jurisdiction over the parties involved in the case.

In intrastate cases, jurisdiction to modify, alter or enforce orders or decrees for the support of children shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of title 36, chapter 5, parts 30 and 31.

In any political subdivision or judicial district of the state in which a court by contract is the agency designated to provide child support enforcement pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, compiled in 42 U.S.C. §§ 651 et seq., and if a judge with child support jurisdiction in that political subdivision or judicial district agrees, the contracting court shall have jurisdiction in any case in such judge's court in which an application is made for assistance in obtaining support under this part. Upon application being made for child support enforcement assistance as provided by law, the contracting court shall assume jurisdiction and it is the duty of the court clerk to so notify the clerk of any court having prior jurisdiction. The contracting court shall then proceed to make and enforce such orders of support as it deems proper within its jurisdiction pursuant to the agreement. The contracting court shall not have jurisdiction in any case in which an absent parent is in full compliance with a support order of another court.

In any case in which the court has exclusive or concurrent jurisdiction to order the payment of child support, the court may issue a child support order when requested by a party. All provisions of title 36, chapter 5 that relate to child support or child support orders that include an order of spousal support and § 50-2-105 apply to support orders issued in these proceedings.

The juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery court of proceedings arising from the 1980 Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the juvenile court has concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit and chancery court of proceedings to establish the paternity of children born out of lawful wedlock and to determine any custody, visitation, support, education or other issues regarding the care and control of children born out of wedlock. The court further has the power to enforce its orders. Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed as vesting the circuit and chancery court with jurisdiction over matters that are in the exclusive jurisdiction of the juvenile court under § 37-1-103.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 4; 1971, ch. 189, § 3; 1975, ch. 248, § 34; 1980, ch. 838, § 4; 1981, ch. 348, § 2; 1983, ch. 453, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 37-204; Acts 1985, ch. 477, § 16; 1989, ch. 206, § 2; 1995, ch. 416, § 1; 1995, ch. 532, § 8; 1997, ch. 551, § 9; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2003, ch. 333, § 2; 2016, ch. 600, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 477, § 1 provided that Acts 1985, ch. 477 may be cited as the “Child Support Enforcement Act of 1985.”

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (b), substituted “the offenses” for “the offense”, and added “and contributing to the dependency of a minor as defined in §37-1-157” to the end of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Cross-References. Expedited process for support, title 36, ch. 5, part 4.

Jurisdiction for intercounty enforcement of support, §36-5-3001.

Termination of Acts 1985, ch. 477, which amended this section, §36-5-110.

Waiver of age requirements and waiting period, §36-3-107.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rules 1 and 29 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure and the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 1 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

This section is referred to in Appendix II of the Rules Of The Circuit Court Of Tennessee For The Thirtieth Judicial District At Memphis, Shelby County.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Courts, § 25, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 27.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

Storied Anna Mae He Decision Clarifies Law But Leaves Unanswered Questions (Christina A. Zawisza), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2008).

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and procedures for emancipation proceedings, OAG 96-064 (4/8/96).

The Parenting Plan Act, §36-6-401 et seq., does not apply to any matter subject to the concurrent jurisdiction of the juvenile court, OAG 01-028 (2/27/01).

Unless and until a party files a proceeding under T.C.A. §§37-1-103 or37-1-104 the juvenile court lacks authority to order a safety plan because it lacks subject matter jurisdiction, OAG 06-012 (1/17/06).

Juvenile, circuit and chancery courts have concurrent jurisdiction to hear petitions to set child support for children of married persons who are living apart when the parties have not filed a petition for divorce or legal separation, OAG 08-189 (12/23/08).

Juvenile court may not rule upon a party's request for legal custody or parenting time, OAG 08-189 (12/23/08).

Jurisdiction over parentage actions in Shelby county. OAG 10-91, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 97 (8/9/10).

Authority to award child support in the absence of a divorce or separation decree. OAG 12-42, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (3/21/12).

Authority of juvenile courts to issue orders of protection. OAG 13-98, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (12/6/13).

37-1-105. Probation officers.

The judge has authority to appoint one (1) or more probation officers who shall receive such salary as shall be fixed by the county legislative body or as otherwise provided by law.

For the purpose of carrying out the objectives and purposes of this part and subject to the limitations of this part or imposed by the court, a probation officer, or other designated officers of the court, shall:

Make investigations, reports and recommendations to the juvenile court;

Receive and examine complaints and charges of delinquency or unruly conduct and conduct a preliminary inquiry;

Receive and examine complaints of dependency and neglect of a child for the purpose of considering the commencement of proceedings under this part;

Supervise and assist a child placed on probation or in such probation officer's protective supervision or care by order of the court or other authority of law;

Make appropriate referrals to other public or private agencies of the community if their assistance appears to be needed or desirable;

Take into custody and detain a child who is under such probation officer's supervision or care as a delinquent, unruly, or dependent and neglected child if the probation officer, or other designated officers of the court, have reasonable cause to believe that the child's health or safety is in imminent danger, or that such child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court, or when ordered by the court pursuant to this part. Such child may be placed in detention or shelter care only if authorized by and in accordance with §§ 37-1-114 and 37-1-115. Except as provided by this part, a probation officer, or other designated officer of the court, does not have the powers of a law enforcement officer. Such probation officer, or other designated officer of the court, shall not conduct accusatory proceedings under this part against a child who is or may be under such officer's care or supervision; and

Perform all other functions designated by this part or by order of the court pursuant thereto.

Any of the functions in subsection (b) may be performed in another state if authorized by the court of this state and permitted by the laws of the other state.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, §§ 5, 6; 1983, ch. 165, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 37-205, 37-206; Acts 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 6-8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added present (b)(3) and redesignated former (b)(3) through (b)(6) as present (b)(4) through (b)(7); rewrote (b)(2) which read: “Receive and examine complaints and charges of delinquency, unruly conduct or dependency and neglect of a child for the purpose of considering the commencement of proceedings under this part”; in present (b)(6), added the second sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “shall” for “may”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

Storied Anna Mae He Decision Clarifies Law But Leaves Unanswered Questions (Christina A. Zawisza), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2008).

The DOJ Comes to Town: An Argument for Legislative Reform When the Juvenile Court Fails to Protect Due Process Rights, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 921 (2014).

37-1-106. Youth services officer.

Each county with a population of more than twenty thousand (20,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may establish a full-time youth services officer to assist the court sitting as a juvenile court in relation to cases coming before the court. Counties with a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or less, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may establish a part-time youth services officer.

The youth services officer shall be paid by the county in which the officer serves and the officer's duties include, but are not limited to, the following:

Intake duties including receiving and examining complaints and allegations of delinquency and unruly behavior for the purpose of conducting a preliminary inquiry;

Counseling;

Record keeping and transmitting information as required by this part or by law to the commission on children and youth or the office of the executive secretary of the Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges;

Make investigations, reports and recommendations to the judge having juvenile jurisdiction;

Make appropriate referrals to other public or private agencies;

Make predisposition studies and submit reports and recommendations to the court as required; and

Perform other functions as directed by the court or by law including, but not limited to, those set out in § 37-1-105.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 19; 1983, ch. 161, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-287; Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “conducting a preliminary inquiry” for “considering the commencement of proceedings” following “purpose of”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Cross-References. Commission on children and youth, title 37, chapter 3.

Temporary retention of disabled correctional officer or youth service worker, §4-6-148.

Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges, title 37, chapter 1, part 5.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 2 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Attorney General Opinions. Employees of the youth services office and of the juvenile court, OAG 07-115 (8/2/07).

37-1-107. Magistrates.

The judge of the juvenile court may appoint one (1) or more suitable persons to act as magistrates at the pleasure of the judge. A magistrate shall be a member of the bar and may qualify and shall hold office at the pleasure of the judge. The compensation of a magistrate shall be fixed by the judge with the approval of the county legislative body or the pertinent governing body, and paid from public funds.

In any county with a population of not less than seventy-one thousand three hundred (71,300) nor more than seventy-one thousand four hundred (71,400), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the child support magistrate appointed to serve the chancery court shall also serve the juvenile court.

The judge may direct that any case or class of cases over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction shall be heard in the first instance by the magistrate. These cases shall be conducted in the same manner as cases heard by the judge. In the conduct of the proceedings, the magistrate shall have the powers of a judge and shall have the same authority as the judge to issue any and all process.

Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the magistrate shall file an order. The magistrate shall also inform each party of the right to a hearing before the juvenile court judge, of the time limits within which a request for a hearing must be perfected, and of the manner in which to perfect the request.

Any party may, within ten (10) days after entry of the magistrate's order, file a request with the court for a de novo hearing by the judge of the juvenile court. The judge shall allow a hearing if a request for hearing is filed. No later than ten (10) days after the entry of the magistrate's order, the judge may, on the judge's own initiative, order a hearing of any matter heard before a magistrate. However, if the child pleads guilty or no contest before the magistrate in a delinquency or unruly proceeding, the child waives the right to request an adjudicatory hearing before the judge and the judge may not order an adjudicatory hearing in such proceeding. If the plea includes an agreement as to disposition, the child also waives the right to request a hearing before the judge regarding disposition and the judge may not order a hearing in such proceeding. Nothing herein alters the court's jurisdiction to hear post-dispositional issues, including, but not limited to, judicial reviews or collateral challenges. There shall be no hearing in any delinquent or unruly case in which the petition is dismissed by the magistrate after a hearing on the merits. Unless the judge orders otherwise, the order of the magistrate shall be the order of the court pending the hearing.

If no hearing before the judge is requested, or if the right to the hearing is expressly waived by all parties within the specified time period, the magistrate's order becomes the order of the court. A party may appeal the order pursuant to § 37-1-159.

Any hearing by a magistrate on any preliminary matter shall be final and not reviewable by the judge of the juvenile court, except on the court's own initiative. The setting of bond in detention hearings and any matter that is a final adjudication of a child shall not be construed to be preliminary matters under this section and are reviewable by the judge of the juvenile court upon request or upon the court's own initiative, except as provided in this section.

All parties to the hearing before the magistrate shall be parties to a de novo hearing before the judge.

Acts 1975, ch. 256, §§ 2-5; 1981, ch. 458, § 1; 1983, ch. 88, § 1; 1983, ch. 254, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-207; Acts 1999, ch. 393, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 646, § 1; 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2016, ch. 716, § 1; 2019, ch. 312, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1983, ch. 254, § 5 provided that the amendment by that act shall not be construed as altering or decreasing the maximum period of eighty-four hours that a juvenile may be detained without a hearing.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to revise appropriate references from “child support referees” and “juvenile referees” to “child support magistrates” and “juvenile magistrates” in the code as supplements are published and volumes are replaced.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (b) – (g), which read, “(b) The judge may direct that any case or class of cases shall be heard in the first instance by the magistrate in all cases wherein the juvenile court has jurisdiction in the manner provided for the hearing of cases by the court.“(c) A magistrate has the same authority as the judge to issue any and all process. The magistrate in the conduct of the proceedings has the powers of a trial judge.“(d) Upon the conclusion of the hearing in each case, the magistrate shall transmit to the judge all papers relating to the case, together with the magistrate's findings and recommendations in writing. Any hearing by a magistrate on any preliminary matter is final and not reviewable by the judge of the juvenile court, except on the court's own motion. The setting of bond in detention hearings and any matter that is a final adjudication of a juvenile shall not be construed to be a preliminary matter under this section and are reviewable by the judge of the juvenile court upon request or upon the court's own motion as provided in this section.“(e) Any party may, within five (5) days thereafter, excluding nonjudicial days, file a request with the court for a hearing by the judge of the juvenile court. The judge may, on the judge's own motion, order a rehearing of any matter heard before a magistrate, and shall allow a hearing if a request for such hearing is filed as herein prescribed. Unless the judge orders otherwise, the recommendation of the magistrate shall be the decree of the court pending a rehearing.“(f) In case no hearing before the judge is requested, or when the right to a hearing is waived, the findings and recommendations of the magistrate become the decree of the court when confirmed by an order of the judge. The final order of the court is, in any event, proof of such confirmation, and also of the fact that the matter was duly referred to the magistrate. A party may appeal such order pursuant to the provisions of §37-1-159.“(g) All prior sections governing the organization, jurisdiction, and management of juvenile courts referred to in this section, that are not in conflict with this section, remain in full force and effect, and all sections in conflict with this section are hereby repealed.”

The 2019 amendment inserted the fourth through sixth sentences in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 716, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 312, § 11. May 8, 2019.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rule 2 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rules 4 and 32 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.2.

Law Reviews.

Blended Sentencing in Tennessee Courts, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 767 (2014).

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

37-1-108. Commencement of proceedings.

A proceeding under this part may be commenced:

By transfer of a case from another court as provided in § 37-1-109;

As provided in § 37-1-146 in a proceeding charging the violation of a traffic offense;

By the court accepting jurisdiction as provided in § 37-1-142 or accepting supervision of a child as provided in § 37-1-144; or

In other cases by the filing of a petition as provided in this part or by issuing a citation as authorized by law. The petition and all other documents in the proceeding, other than a citation, shall be entitled “In the matter of _____, a child under eighteen (18) years of age.”

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 8; T.C.A., § 37-208; Acts 2016, ch. 598, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “37-1-142” for “37-1-141” and “37-1-144” for “37-1-143” in (3) and added “or by issuing a citation as authorized by law” to the end of the first sentence in (4) and inserted “, other than a citation,” following “proceeding” in the middle of the second sentence of (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 598, § 5. July 1, 2016.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VI. Juvenile Courts (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 469 (1978).

37-1-109. Transfer of criminal cases from other courts.

If it appears to the court in a criminal proceeding that the defendant is a child, the court shall forthwith transfer the case to the juvenile court, together with a copy of the accusatory pleading and other papers, documents and transcripts of testimony relating to the case.

It shall order that the defendant be taken forthwith to the juvenile court or to a place of detention designated by the juvenile court, or release the defendant to the custody of the defendant's parent, guardian, custodian or other person legally responsible for the defendant, to be brought before the juvenile court at a time designated by that court.

The accusatory pleading may serve in lieu of a petition in the juvenile court unless that court directs the filing of a petition.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 9; T.C.A., § 37-209.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, §§ 11, 35.

Law Reviews.

Toward Fundamental Fairness in the Kangaroo Courtroom: The Due Process Case Against Statutes Presumptively Closing Juvenile Proceedings, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 1751 (2001).

37-1-110. Informal adjustment without adjudication — Pretrial diversion — No admission required.

Before or after a petition is filed, a designated court officer may informally resolve a complaint containing delinquent or unruly allegations without adjudication by giving counsel and advice to the child if such informal resolution would be in the best interest of the public and the child, and the child and the child's parents, guardian, or other custodian consent to the informal adjustment with knowledge that consent is not obligatory. The informal adjustment shall not extend beyond three (3) months from the day commenced, unless extended by the court for an additional period not to exceed a total of six (6) months, and does not authorize the attachment or detention of the child if not otherwise permitted by this part.

If the child and the victim agree to restitution, restitution may be paid independently of informal adjustment; however, financial obligations shall not be assessed or collected against a child as part of an informal adjustment pursuant to this section.

After a petition has been filed and a designated court officer determines that an unruly or delinquent case is an appropriate case for diversion from adjudication, the parties may agree to pretrial diversion that suspends the proceedings and places the child under supervision on terms and conditions agreeable to the designated court officer and approved by the court. A child may not be placed on pretrial diversion if the delinquent act alleged is an offense described in § 37-1-153(b).

A pretrial diversion agreement shall remain in force for a maximum of six (6) months unless the child is discharged sooner by the court. Upon application of any party to the proceedings, made before expiration of the six-month period and after notice and a hearing, pretrial diversion may be extended by the court for an additional six (6) months.

If, prior to discharge by the court or expiration of the pretrial diversion period, the child fails to fulfill the terms and conditions of the pretrial diversion agreement, the original petition may be reinstated and the case may proceed to adjudication just as if the agreement had never been entered.

Attachment and detention of a child are not authorized for the violation of a pretrial diversion agreement unless otherwise permitted by this part.

The petition shall be dismissed with prejudice once a child completes an informal adjustment pursuant to subsection (a) or pretrial diversion pursuant to subsection (b) without reinstatement of the original delinquent or unruly petition.

No admission shall be required as part of informal adjustment or pretrial diversion, and any statements made by the child during the preliminary inquiry, informal adjustment pursuant to subsection (a), or pretrial diversion pursuant to subsection (b) are not admissible prior to a dispositional hearing.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 10; 1981, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-210; Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 2; 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 10, 11; 2019, ch. 312, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a) Before or after a petition is filed, the probation officer or other officer of the court designated by it, subject to its direction, may give counsel and advice to the parties with a view to an informal adjustment if it appears:“(1) The admitted facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court;“(2) Counsel and advice without an adjudication would be in the best interest of the public and the child; and“(3) The child and the child's parents, guardian or other custodian consent thereto with knowledge that consent is not obligatory.“(b) The giving of counsel and advice cannot extend beyond three (3) months from the day commenced unless extended by the court and does not authorize the detention of the child if not otherwise permitted by this part.”

The 2018 amendment added (a)(2); in present (a)(1), rewrote the last sentence which read: “The informal adjustment shall not extend beyond three (3) months from the day commenced unless extended by the court and does not authorize the detention of the child if not otherwise permitted by this part.”; and added (d).

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “attachment or” following “authorize the”; and added (b)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 312, § 11. May 8, 2019.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rules 13 and 14 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 14 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

37-1-111. Venue.

A proceeding under this part may be commenced in the county in which the child resides.

If delinquent or unruly conduct is alleged, the proceeding may be commenced in the county in which the acts constituting the alleged delinquent or unruly conduct occurred.

If dependency or neglect is alleged, the proceeding may be brought in the county in which the child is present when it is commenced.

Proceedings to terminate parental rights shall be brought pursuant to § 36-1-113.

If unruly conduct is alleged against a child in the custody of the department of children's services, the proceeding may be brought in the juvenile court exercising continuing jurisdiction under § 37-1-103 or it may be brought in the juvenile court that issued the order granting custody to the department.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 11; 1971, ch. 189, § 4; 1983, ch. 435, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-211; Acts 1995, ch. 532, §§ 9, 10; 2011, ch. 275, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 3 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.3.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-112. Transfer to another court within state — Appeals.

If the child resides in a county of this state and the proceeding is commenced in a court of another county, the court, on motion of a party or on its own motion after a finding of fact, may transfer the proceeding to the county of the child's residence for further action. Like transfer may be made if the residence of the child changes pending the proceeding. The proceeding may be transferred if the child has been adjudicated delinquent or unruly, or neglected or abandoned and other proceedings involving the child are pending in the juvenile court of the county of the child's residence.

If a juvenile court proceeding is commenced under this part and a proceeding involving the child's custody is also commenced or pending in the circuit, chancery or general sessions court exercising domestic relations jurisdiction, the juvenile court, on motion of a party or on its own motion after an adjudication making specific findings of fact pursuant to § 37-1-129(a)(2) and after ordering any essential services for the child and family, may transfer the custody proceeding to the court where the pending matter has been commenced. Like transfer may be made if the residence of the child changes during the pendency of the juvenile court proceedings. The transfer shall only occur upon a finding of fact by the transferring court that the transfer will be in the best interest of the child, will promote judicial economy, will provide a more reasonable or convenient forum, or for other good cause. The transferring court may communicate with the receiving court concerning the transfer of the case. The transfer of the custody proceeding to another court exercising domestic relations jurisdiction, except to another juvenile court, shall not occur if the case involves allegations of dependency, neglect or abuse and the child is in the custody of the department of children's services.

Certified copies of all legal and social documents and records pertaining to the case on file with the clerk of the court shall accompany the transfer.

An appeal of a transfer decision under this part shall be to the court of appeals in accordance with the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 12; 1972, ch. 592, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-212; Acts 2001, ch. 297, §§ 2-4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 297, § 5 provided that the act shall apply to any case pending or filed on or after July 1, 2001. Any custody order that has been entered by a court exercising domestic relations jurisdiction and that is not the subject of or eligible for appeal on July 1, 2001, shall be valid and is hereby declared to be in full compliance with the laws of this state.

Cross-References. Transfer to another state, §37-1-141.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-113. Taking into custody — Grounds.

A child may be taken into custody:

Pursuant to an order of the court under this part;

Pursuant to the laws of arrest;

By a law enforcement officer, social worker of the department of human services, or duly authorized officer of the court, if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the conditions specified in § 37-1-114(a)(2) exist; or

By a law enforcement officer or duly authorized officer of the court if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the child has run away from the child's parents, guardian or other custodian.

The taking of a child into custody is not an arrest, except for the purpose of determining its validity under the Constitution of Tennessee or the Constitution of the United States.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 13; 1977, ch. 482, § 14; 1981, ch. 247, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-213.

Cross-References. Arrest, title 40, ch. 7.

Protective custody of sexually abused children, §37-1-608.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text of Rule 5 and in the Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 11 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.3.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).